incubator/apertium-hi-en-wx/apertium_hn.dix
<pardef n="h/o__v">
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oUz</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oUz</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oie</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oie</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiye</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiye</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oyeM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oyeM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oez</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oez</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oie</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oie</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiye</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oiye</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oyeM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oyeM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oez</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oez</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>onA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>onA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>onA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>onA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>one</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>one</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>one</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>one</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>onI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>onI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>onI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>onI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>onIM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>onIM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>onIM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>onIM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>owA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="ho"><i>h</i><par n="h/o__v"/></e>
